Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.050

Reports of well construction or decommissioning.

(1) Any person authorized by this chapter to construct or decommission a well shall furnish a well report to the director within thirty days after the completion of the construction or decommissioning of a well. The director, by rule, shall prescribe the form of the report and the information to be contained therein.

(2) In the case of a dewatering well project:

(a) A single well construction report may be submitted for all similar dewatering wells constructed with no significant change in geologic formation; and

(b) A single well decommissioning report may be submitted for all similar dewatering wells decommissioned that have no significant change in geologic formation.

[ 2005 c 84 s 3; 1993 c 387 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 5.]